California statutes. Probate Code
(e) (1) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed by this section until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose. 

(2) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to the amendments to this section enacted by the measure that added this paragraph until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 9.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.

(a) (1) If court review is required pursuant to Section 1850 or 1850.5, the court investigator shall, without prior notice to the conservator except as ordered by the court for necessity or to prevent harm to the conservatee, visit the conservatee. The court investigator shall inform the conservatee personally that the conservatee is under a conservatorship and shall give the name of the conservator to the conservatee. The court investigator shall determine all of the following:

(A) If
 the conservatee wishes the court
 to terminate the conservatorship.

(B) If the conservatee wishes the court to remove the conservator and appoint a successor conservator.

(C) If both of the following are true:

(i) The conservatee still meets the criteria for appointment of a conservator of the person under subdivision (a) of Section 1801, a conservator of the estate under subdivision (b) of Section 1801, or both.

(ii) The conservatorship remains the least restrictive alternative needed for the protection of the conservatee, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 1800.3.

(D) If the conservator is acting in the best interests of the conservatee. In determining if the conservator is acting in the best interests of the conservatee, the court investigator’s evaluation shall include an examination of the conservatee’s placement, the quality of care, including physical and mental health treatment, and the conservatee’s finances. To the extent practicable, the investigator shall review the accounting with a conservatee who has sufficient capacity. To the greatest extent possible, the court investigator shall interview individuals set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1826, in order to determine if the conservator is acting in the best interests of the conservatee.

(E) (i) If the conservatee is incapable of communicating,
 with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process and may be disqualified from voting pursuant to Section 2208 or 2209 of the Elections Code.

(ii) The conservatee shall not be disqualified from voting on the basis that the conservatee does, or would need to do, any of the following to complete an affidavit of voter registration:

(I) Signs the affidavit of voter registration with a mark or a cross pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(II) Signs the affidavit of voter registration by means of a signature stamp pursuant to Section 354.5 of the Elections Code.

(III) Completes the affidavit of voter
 registration with the assistance of another person pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(IV) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with reasonable accommodations.

(2) If the court
 investigator determines that the conservatee still meets the criteria for appointment of a conservator under Section 1801, the investigator shall determine if the terms of the appointment order should be modified to reduce or expand the conservator’s powers and duties to ensure that the conservatorship is the least restrictive alternative needed for the conservatee’s protection.

(3) Upon request of the court investigator, the conservator shall make available to the court investigator during the
 investigation for inspection and copying all books and records, including receipts and any expenditures, of the conservatorship.

(b) (1) The findings of the court investigator, including the facts upon which the findings are based, shall be certified in writing to the court not less than 15 days before the date of review. A copy of the report shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the conservatee, the conservator, and the attorneys of record for the conservator and conservatee at the same time it is certified to the court. A copy of the report, modified as set forth in paragraph (2), also shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the conservatee’s spouse or registered domestic partner and the conservatee’s relatives in the first degree, or, if there are no such relatives, to the next closest relative, unless
 the court determines that the delivery will harm the conservatee.

(2) Confidential medical information and confidential information from the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System shall be in a separate attachment to the report and shall not be provided in copies sent to the conservatee’s spouse or registered domestic partner and the conservatee’s relatives in the first degree, or, if there are no such relatives, to the next closest relative.

(c) In the case of a limited conservatee, the court investigator shall recommend whether to continue, modify, or terminate the limited conservatorship.

(d) The court investigator may personally visit the conservator and any other persons necessary to determine if
 the conservator is acting in the best interests of the conservatee.

(e) The report required by this section shall be confidential and shall be made available only to parties, persons described in subdivision (b), persons given notice of the petition who have requested the report or who have appeared in the proceeding, their attorneys, and the court. The court shall have discretion at any other time to release the report if it would serve the interests of the conservatee. The clerk of the court shall limit disclosure of the report exclusively to persons entitled to the report under this section.

(f) (1) A superior court is not required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to the amendments to this section enacted by Chapter 493 of the Statutes of 2006
 until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose. 

(2) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to the amendments to this section enacted by the measure that added this paragraph until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 10.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.1.

(a) When a court issues an order provisionally granting a petition under Section 2002, the investigator appointed under Section 2002 shall promptly commence an investigation under this section.

(b) In conducting an investigation and preparing a report under this section, the court investigator shall do all of the following:

(1) Comply with the requirements of Section 1851.

(2) Conduct an interview of the conservator.

(3) Conduct an interview of the conservatee’s spouse or registered domestic partner, if
 any.

(4) Inform the conservatee of the nature, purpose, and effect of the conservatorship.

(5) Inform the conservatee and all other persons entitled to notice under subdivision (b) of Section 2002 of the right to seek termination of the conservatorship.

(6) Determine whether the conservatee objects to the conservator or prefers another person to act as conservator.

(7) Inform the conservatee of the right to attend the hearing under subdivision (c).

(8) Determine whether it appears that the conservatee is unable to attend the hearing and, if able to attend, whether the conservatee is willing to
 attend the hearing.

(9) Inform the conservatee of the right to be represented by legal
 counsel if the conservatee so chooses, and to have legal counsel appointed by the court if the conservatee is unable to retain legal counsel.

(10) Determine whether the conservatee wishes to be represented by legal counsel and, if so, whether the conservatee has retained legal counsel and, if not, the name of an attorney the conservatee wishes to retain.

(11) If the conservatee has not retained legal counsel, determine whether the conservatee desires the court to appoint legal counsel.

(12) Determine whether the appointment of legal counsel would be helpful to the resolution of the matter or is necessary to protect the interests of the conservatee when the conservatee does not plan to retain legal counsel
 and has not requested the appointment of legal counsel by the court.

(13) Consider each of the categories specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1821.

(14) Consider, to the extent practicable, whether the investigator believes the conservatee suffers from any of the mental function deficits listed in subdivision (a) of Section 811 that significantly impairs the conservatee’s ability to understand and appreciate the consequences of the conservatee’s actions in connection with any of the functions described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1801 and identify the observations that support that belief.

(c) The court shall review the conservatorship as provided in Section 2002. The
 conservatee shall attend the hearing unless the conservatee’s attendance is excused under Section 1825. The court may take appropriate action in response to the court investigator’s report under this section.

(d) The court investigator’s report under this section shall be confidential as provided in Section 1851.

(e) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1850, the court shall review the conservatorship again one year after the review conducted pursuant to subdivision (c), and annually thereafter, in the manner specified in Section 1850.

(f) The first time that the need for a conservatorship is challenged by any interested person or raised on the court’s own motion after a transfer under Section
 2002, whether in a review pursuant to this section or in a petition to terminate the
 conservatorship under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1860), the court shall presume that there is no need for a conservatorship. This presumption is rebuttable, but can only be overcome by clear and convincing evidence. The court shall make an express finding on whether continuation of the conservatorship is the least restrictive alternative needed for the protection of the conservatee.

(g) (1) If a duty described in this section is the same as a duty imposed pursuant to the amendments to Sections 1826, 1850, 1851, 2250, 2253, and 2620 and the addition of Sections 2250.4 and 2250.6 enacted by Chapter 493 of the Statutes of 2006, and the addition of Section 1051 enacted by Chapter 492 of the Statutes of 2006, a superior court shall not be required to perform that duty until the Legislature makes an
 appropriation identified for this purpose. 

(2) If a duty described in this section is the same as a duty imposed pursuant to the amendments to Sections 1826, 1850, 1851, 2250, 2250.4, 2250.6, 2253, and 2620 enacted by the measure that added this paragraph, a superior court shall not be required to perform that duty until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 11.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.2.

Each court shall coordinate investigations with the filing of accountings, so that investigators may review accountings before visiting conservatees, if feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 553, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.5.

Each court shall assess each conservatee in the county for any investigation or review conducted by a court investigator with respect to that person. Subject to Section 68631 of the Government Code, the court may order reimbursement to the court for the amount of the assessment, unless the court finds that all or any part of the assessment would impose a hardship on conservatee or the conservatee’s estate. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the assessment would impose a hardship if the conservatee is receiving Medi-Cal benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 30.5.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.6.

(a) Any interested person, as defined in Section 48 or any person entitled to receive notice pursuant to Section 1822, if they have personal knowledge of a conservatee, may petition
 the court to investigate an allegation of abuse, as defined by Section 15610.07 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, of the conservatee by a conservator. The court shall investigate all such allegations that establish a prima facie case of abuse. If the court investigator has performed an investigation within the preceding six months and reported the results of that investigation to the court, the court may order, upon good cause shown, that a new investigation is not necessary or that a more limited investigation is sufficient.

(b) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to this section until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 12.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1852.

If the conservatee wishes to petition the court for termination of the conservatorship or for removal of the existing conservator or for the making, modification, or revocation of a court order under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1870) or for restoration of the right to register to vote, or if, based on information contained in the court investigator’s report or obtained from any other source, the court determines that a trial or hearing for termination of the conservatorship or removal of the existing conservator is in the best interests of the conservatee, the court shall notify the attorney of record for the conservatee, if any, or shall appoint the public defender or private counsel under Section 1471, to file the petition and represent the conservatee at the trial or hearing and, if such appointment is made, Section 1472 applies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.

(a) If the court investigator is unable to locate the conservatee, the court shall order the court investigator to serve notice upon the conservator of the person, or upon the conservator of the estate if there is no conservator of the person, in the manner provided in Section 415.10 or 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure or in such other manner as is ordered by the court, to make the conservatee available for the purposes of Section 1851 to the court investigator within 15 days of the receipt of such notice or to show cause why the conservatorship should not be terminated.

(b) If the conservatee is not made available within the time prescribed, unless good cause is shown for not doing so, the court shall make such a finding and shall enter judgment terminating the conservatorship and, in case of a conservatorship of the estate, shall order the conservator to file an account and to surrender the estate to the person legally entitled thereto. At the hearing, or thereafter on further notice and hearing, the conservator may be discharged and the bond given by the conservator may be exonerated upon the settlement and approval of the conservator’s final account by the court.

(c) Termination of the conservatorship under this section does not preclude institution of new proceedings for the appointment of a conservator. Nothing in this section limits the power of a court to appoint a temporary conservator under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2250) of Part 4.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Termination [1860. - 1865.]

1860.

(a) A conservatorship continues until terminated by the death of the conservatee or by order of the court pursuant to Section 1863, subject to Section 2467 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 2630) of Chapter 7 of Part 4, and except as otherwise provided by law.

(b) At a hearing under Section 1850 or a hearing on a petition to terminate a conservatorship under Section 1861, the court shall proceed as provided in Section 1863. 

(c) If a conservatorship is established for the person of a married minor, the conservatorship does not terminate automatically if the marriage is dissolved or is adjudged a nullity.

(d) This section does not apply to limited conservatorships.

(e) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to the amendments to this section enacted by the measure that added this subdivision until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 13.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1860.5.

(a) A limited conservatorship continues until the authority of the conservator is terminated by one of the following:

(1) The death of the limited conservator.

(2) The death of the limited conservatee.

(3) An order appointing a conservator of the former limited conservatee.

(4) An order of the court terminating the limited conservatorship.

(b) A petition for the termination of a limited conservatorship may be filed by any of the following:

(1) The limited conservator.

(2) The limited conservatee.

(3) Any relative or friend of the limited conservatee.

(c) The petition shall state facts showing that the limited conservatorship is no longer required.

(d) Notice of a hearing pursuant to Section 1850.5 or on a petition filed pursuant to this section shall be given to the same persons and in the same manner as provided for a petition for the appointment of a limited conservator.

(1) If a petition is filed and the limited conservator is not the petitioner, or has not joined in the petition, the limited conservator shall be served with a notice of the time and place of the hearing accompanied by a copy of the petition
 at least five days prior to the hearing. This service shall be made in the same manner provided for in Section 415.10 or 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure or in another manner authorized by the court. If the limited conservator cannot, with reasonable diligence, be so served with notice, the court may dispense with notice.

(2) If the court sets a hearing pursuant to Section 1850.5 to consider termination of a limited conservatorship and no petition is filed, the court shall order the limited conservator to give notice of the hearing as provided in this subdivision and to appear at the hearing and show cause why the limited conservatorship should not be terminated.

(e) (1) The limited conservatee shall be produced at the hearing except in the following cases:

(A) When the limited conservatee
 is out of the state and is not the petitioner.

(B) When the limited conservatee is unable to attend the hearing by reason of medical inability.

(C) When the court investigator has reported to the court that the limited conservatee has expressly communicated that the limited conservatee (i) is not willing to attend the hearing, (ii) does not wish to contest the continuation of the limited conservatorship, and (iii) does not object to the current limited conservator or prefer that another person act as limited conservator, and the court makes an order that the limited conservatee need not attend the hearing.

(2) If the limited conservatee is unable to attend the hearing because of medical inability, that inability shall be established by the affidavit or certificate of a licensed medical practitioner or, if the
 conservatee is an adherent of a religion whose tenets and practices call for reliance on prayer alone for healing and is under treatment by an accredited practitioner of that religion, by the affidavit of the practitioner. The affidavit or certificate is evidence only of the limited conservatee’s inability to attend the hearing and shall not be considered in determining the issue of need for the continuation of the limited conservatorship.

(3) Emotional or psychological instability is not good cause for the absence of the conservatee from the hearing unless, by reason of that instability, attendance at the hearing is likely to cause serious and immediate physiological damage to the conservatee.

(f) The limited conservator or any relative or friend of the limited conservatee may appear and support or oppose termination of the limited conservatorship. The court shall hear and
 determine the matter according to the laws and procedures relating to the trial of civil actions, including trial by jury if demanded. If the court terminates the limited conservatorship, the limited conservator may, either at the hearing or thereafter on further notice and hearing, be discharged and the bond exonerated upon the settlement and approval of the final account by the court.

(g) (1) The court shall order the termination of the limited conservatorship unless the court finds, on the record and by clear and convincing evidence, that the limited conservatee still meets the criteria for appointment of a limited conservator under Section 1801 and a limited conservatorship remains the least restrictive alternative needed for the limited conservatee’s protection.

(2) If the petition for termination is uncontested and states facts showing that both the
 limited conservator and limited conservatee wish to terminate the limited conservatorship, and the conservatorship is no longer the least restrictive alternative for the limited conservatee’s protection, the court may terminate the limited conservatorship without an evidentiary hearing.

(h) If the court determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that the limited conservatee meets the criteria for appointment of a limited conservator under Section 1801, the court shall determine whether to modify the powers granted to the limited conservator to ensure that the limited conservatorship remains the least restrictive alternative needed for the limited conservatee’s protection. If the court modifies any powers granted to the limited conservator, new letters shall issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 12.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.

(a) A petition for the termination of the conservatorship may be filed by any of the following:

(1) The conservator.

(2) The conservatee.

(3) The spouse, or domestic partner, or any relative or friend of the conservatee or other interested person.

(b) The petition shall state facts showing that the conservatorship is no longer required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.5.

Upon the receipt of a communication from the conservatee that the conservatee wishes to terminate the conservatorship, a court shall appoint counsel for the conservatee and set a hearing for the termination of the conservatorship when either of the following conditions apply:

(a) There has not been a hearing for the termination of the conservatorship within the 12 months preceding the communication from the conservatee.

(b) The court believes there is good cause to set a hearing for the termination of the conservatorship.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 13.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1862.

(a) Notice of the hearing to consider the termination of the conservatorship shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(b) If the court sets a hearing pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1850 and no petition is filed, the court shall order the conservator to give notice of the hearing as provided in subdivision (a), and to appear at the hearing and show cause why the conservatorship should not be terminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 15.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1863.

(a) The court shall hear and determine the matter according to the law and procedure relating to the trial of civil actions, including trial by jury if demanded by the conservatee. The conservator, the conservatee, the spouse or domestic partner, or any relative or friend of the conservatee or other interested person may appear and support or oppose the termination of the conservatorship.

(b) (1) The conservatee shall be produced at the hearing except in the following cases:

(A) When the conservatee is out of the state and is not the petitioner.

(B) When the conservatee is unable to attend the hearing by reason of
 medical inability.

(C) When the court investigator has reported to the court that the conservatee has expressly communicated that the conservatee (i) is not willing to attend the hearing, (ii) does not wish to contest the continuation of the conservatorship, and (iii) does not object to the current conservator or prefer that another person act as conservator, and the court makes an order that the conservatee need not attend the hearing.

(2) If the conservatee is unable to attend the hearing because of medical inability, that inability shall be established by the affidavit or certificate of a licensed medical practitioner or, if the conservatee is an adherent of a religion whose tenets and practices call for reliance on prayer alone for healing and is under treatment by an accredited practitioner of that religion, by the affidavit of the practitioner. The affidavit or certificate
 is evidence only of the conservatee’s inability to attend the hearing and shall not be considered in determining the issue of need for the continuation of the conservatorship.

(3) Emotional or psychological instability is not good cause for the absence of the conservatee from the hearing unless, by reason of that instability, attendance at the hearing is likely to cause serious and immediate physiological damage to the conservatee.

(c) Unless the court determines, on the record and by clear and convincing evidence, that (1) the conservatee still meets the criteria for appointment of a conservator of the person under subdivision (a) of Section 1801, a conservator of the estate under subdivision (b) of Section 1801, or both; and (2) a conservatorship remains the least restrictive alternative needed for the conservatee’s protection, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 1800.3,
 the court shall enter judgment terminating the conservatorship.

(d) If the court determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that the conservatee meets the criteria for appointment of a conservator of the person under subdivision (a) of Section 1801, a conservator of the estate under subdivision (b) of Section 1801, or both, the court shall determine whether to modify the existing powers of the conservator to ensure that the conservatorship remains the least restrictive alternative needed for the conservatee’s protection and shall order the conservatorship to continue accordingly. If the court modifies the existing powers of the conservator, new letters shall issue.

(e) At the hearing, or thereafter on further notice and hearing, the conservator may be discharged and the bond given by the conservator may be exonerated upon the settlement and approval of the conservator’s final
 account by the court.

(f) This section does not apply to limited conservatorships.

(g) Termination of conservatorship does not preclude a new proceeding for appointment of a conservator on the same or other grounds.

(h) If a petition for termination pursuant to Section 1861 is uncontested and states facts showing that both the conservator and conservatee wish to terminate the conservatorship and the conservatorship is no longer the least restrictive alternative for the conservatee’s protection, the court may terminate the conservatorship without an evidentiary hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 14.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1864.

(a) In the case of the conservatorship of an absentee as defined in Section 1403, the petition to terminate the conservatorship may also be filed by any officer or agency of this state or of the United States or the authorized delegate thereof.

(b) If the petition states and the court determines that the absentee has returned to the controllable jurisdiction of the military department or civilian department or agency concerned, or is deceased, as determined under 37 United States Code, Section 556, or 5 United States Code, Section 5566, as the case may be, the court shall order the conservatorship terminated. An official written report or record of such military department or civilian department or agency that the absentee has returned to such controllable jurisdiction or is deceased shall be received as evidence of such fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1865.

If the conservatee has been disqualified from voting pursuant to Section 2208 or 2209 of the Elections Code, upon termination of the conservatorship, the court shall notify the county elections official of the county of residence of the former conservatee that the former conservatee’s right to register to vote is restored.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Legal Capacity of Conservatee [1870. - 1901.]



  ARTICLE 1. Capacity to Bind or Obligate Conservatorship Estate [1870. - 1876.]

1870.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “transaction” includes, but is not limited to, making a contract, sale, transfer, or conveyance, incurring a debt or encumbering property, making a gift, delegating a power, and waiving a right.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to deny a conservatee any of the following:

(a) The right to control an allowance provided under Section 2421.

(b) The right to control wages or salary to the extent provided in Section 2601.

(c) The right to make a will.

(d) The right to enter into transactions to the extent reasonable to provide the necessaries of life to the conservatee and the spouse and minor children of the conservatee and to provide the basic living expenses, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, to the domestic partner of the conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, the appointment of a conservator of the estate is an adjudication that the conservatee lacks the legal capacity to enter into or make any transaction that binds or obligates the conservatorship estate.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in the order of the court appointing a limited conservator, the appointment does not limit the legal capacity of the limited conservatee to enter into transactions or types of transactions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1873.

(a) In the order appointing the conservator or upon a petition filed under Section 1874, the court may, by order, authorize the conservatee, subject to Section 1876, to enter into transactions or types of transactions as may be appropriate in the circumstances of the particular conservatee and conservatorship estate. The court, by order, may modify the legal capacity a conservatee would otherwise have under Section 1872 by broadening or restricting the power of the conservatee to enter into transactions or types of transactions as may be appropriate in the circumstances of the particular conservatee and conservatorship estate.

(b) In an order made under this section, the court may include limitations or conditions on the exercise of the authority granted to the conservatee as the court determines to be appropriate including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) A requirement that for specific types of transactions or for all transactions authorized by the order, the conservatee obtain prior approval of the transaction by the court or conservator before exercising the authority granted by the order.

(2) A provision that the conservator has the right to avoid any transaction made by the conservatee pursuant to the authority of the order if the transaction is not one into which a reasonably prudent person might enter.

(c) The court, in its discretion, may provide in the order that, unless extended by subsequent order of the court, the order or specific provisions of the order terminate at a time specified in the order.

(d) An order under this section continues in effect until the earliest of the following times:

(1) The time specified in the order, if any.

(2) The time the order is modified or revoked.

(3) The time the conservatorship of the estate is terminated.

(e) An order under this section may be modified or revoked upon petition filed by the conservator, conservatee, the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee, or any relative or friend of the conservatee, or any interested person. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.

(a) After a conservator has been appointed, a petition requesting an order under Section 1873 may be filed by any of the following:

(1) The conservator.

(2) The conservatee.

(3) The spouse, domestic partner, or any relative or friend of the conservatee.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.

A transaction that affects real property of the conservatorship estate, entered into by a person acting in good faith and for a valuable consideration and without knowledge of the establishment of the conservatorship, is not affected by any provision of this article or any order made under this article unless a notice of the establishment of the conservatorship or temporary conservatorship has been recorded prior to the transaction in the county in which the property is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 82, Sec. 20.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

1876.

The provisions of this article relating to the legal capacity of a conservatee to bind or obligate the conservatorship estate, and the provisions of any order of the court broadening such capacity, do not displace but are supplemented by general principles of law and equity relating to transactions including, but not limited to, capacity to contract, joinder or consent requirements, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, or other validating or invalidating cause.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Capacity to Give Informed Consent for Medical Treatment [1880. - 1898.]

1880.

If the court determines that there is no form of medical treatment for which the conservatee has the capacity to give an informed consent, the court shall (1) adjudge that the conservatee lacks the capacity to give informed consent for medical treatment and (2) by order give the conservator of the person the powers specified in Section 2355. If an order is made under this section, the letters shall include a statement that the conservator has the powers specified in Section 2355.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1881.

(a) A conservatee shall be deemed unable to give informed consent to any form of medical treatment pursuant to Section 1880 if, for all medical treatments, the conservatee is unable to respond knowingly and intelligently to queries about medical treatment or is unable to participate in a treatment decision by means of a rational thought process.

(b) In order for a court to determine that a conservatee is unable to respond knowingly and intelligently to queries about his or her medical treatment or is unable to participate in treatment decisions by means of a rational thought process, a court shall do both of the following:

(1) Determine that, for all medical treatments, the conservatee is unable to understand at least one of the following items of minimum basic medical treatment information:

(A) The nature and seriousness of any illness, disorder, or defect that the conservatee has or may develop.

(B) The nature of any medical treatment that is being or may be recommended by the conservatee’s health care providers.

(C) The probable degree and duration of any benefits and risks of any medical intervention that is being or may be recommended by the conservatee’s health care providers, and the consequences of lack of treatment.

(D) The nature, risks, and benefits of any reasonable alternatives.

(2) Determine that one or more of the mental functions of the conservatee described in subdivision (a) of Section 811 is impaired and that there is a link between the deficit or deficits and the conservatee’s inability to give informed consent.

(c) A deficit in the mental functions listed in subdivision (a) of Section 811 may be considered only if the deficit by itself, or in combination with one or more other mental function deficits, significantly impairs the conservatee’s ability to understand the consequences of his or her decisions regarding medical care.

(d) In determining whether a conservatee’s mental functioning is so severely impaired that the conservatee lacks the capacity to give informed consent to any form of medical treatment, the court may take into consideration the frequency, severity, and duration of periods of impairment.

(e) In the interest of minimizing unnecessary expense to the parties to a proceeding, paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not apply to a petition pursuant to Section 1880 wherein the conservatee, after notice by the court of his or her right to object which, at least, shall include an interview by a court investigator pursuant to Section 1826 prior to the hearing on the petition, does not object to the proposed finding of incapacity, or waives any objections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 178, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1890.

(a) An order of the court under Section 1880 may be included in the order of appointment of the conservator if the order was requested in the petition for the appointment of the conservator or the transfer petition under Section 2002 or, except in the case of a limited conservator, may be made subsequently upon a petition made, noticed, and heard by the court in the manner provided in this article.

(b) In the case of a petition filed under this chapter requesting that the court make an order under this chapter or that the court modify or revoke an order made under this chapter, when the order applies to a limited conservatee, the order may only be made upon a petition made, noticed,
 and heard by the court in the manner provided by Article 3 (commencing with Section 1820) of Chapter 1.
